Massachusetts, session 194th, H2942.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding section 9 of chapter 32 of the General Laws or any other
general or special law to the contrary, the state board of retirement shall provide to Kristen
Arakelian, the surviving beneficiary of former State Police Sergeant Brandon Arakelian, a
lifetime, monthly allowance equal to the amount which she would have received if Brandon
Arakelian had been awarded an accidental disability retirement under section 7 of said chapter 32
based on post-traumatic stress disorder effective June 4, 2021, and in light of his death certificate
which lists suicide as cause of death and post-traumatic stress disorder as his condition. The
allowance shall be payable as of the date of Brandon Arakelian’s retirement, June 4, 2021,
except that any amounts paid pursuant to his superannuation pension shall be deducted.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1